Utah statutes.
17-52-504.   County executive-council form of county government.
(1) (a)  A county operating under the form of government known as the "county
executive-council" form shall be governed by an elected county council, an
elected county executive, and such other officers and employees as are
authorized by law.
(b)  The optional plan shall provide for the qualifications, time, and manner
of election, term of office and compensation of the county executive.
(2)  The county executive shall be the chief executive officer or body of the
county.
(3)  In the county executive-council form of county government:
(a)  the county council is the county legislative body and shall have the
powers, duties, and functions of a county legislative body under Chapter 53,
Part 2, County Legislative Body; and
(b)  the county executive shall have the powers, duties, and functions of a
county executive under Chapter 53, Part 3, County Executive.
(4)  References in any statute or state rule to the "governing body" or the
"board of county commissioners" of the county, in the county executive-council
form of county government, means:
(a)  the county council, with respect to legislative functions, duties, and
powers; and
(b)  the county executive, with respect to executive functions, duties, and
powers.
